Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.150

Temporary restraining order restricting visitation for persons accused of sexually or physically abusing a child—Penalty for violating court order.

(1) If a person who has unsupervised visitation rights with a minor child pursuant to a court order is accused of sexually or physically abusing a child and the alleged abuse has been reported to the proper authorities for investigation, the law enforcement officer conducting the investigation may file an affidavit with the prosecuting attorney stating that the person is currently under investigation for sexual or physical abuse of a child and that there is a risk of harm to the child if a temporary restraining order is not entered. Upon receipt of the affidavit, the prosecuting attorney shall determine whether there is a risk of harm to the child if a temporary restraining order is not entered. If the prosecutor determines there is a risk of harm, the prosecutor shall immediately file a motion for an order to show cause seeking to restrict visitation with the child, and seek a temporary restraining order. The restraining order shall be issued for up to ninety days or until the investigation has been concluded in favor of the alleged abuser, whichever is shorter.

(2) Willful violation of a court order entered under this section is a misdemeanor. The court order shall state: "Violation of this order is a criminal offense under chapter 26.44 RCW and will subject the violator to arrest."

[ 1993 c 412 s 18.]